California statutes. Education Code
The governing board of a school district may authorize any officer or employee of the district to sell to any pupil personal property of the district which has been fabricated by such pupil, at the cost to the district of the materials furnished by the district and used therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17552.

The governing board of a school district may sell to persons enrolled in classes for adults maintained by the district any materials that may be necessary for the making of articles by those persons in those classes. The materials shall be sold at not less than the cost thereof to the district and any article made therefrom shall be the property of the person making it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17553.

A school district may, in accordance with regulations adopted by the governing board of the district and for educational use, sell, give, or exchange for similar published materials, published materials prepared by the district in connection with the curricular and special services that the district is authorized to perform. Unless restricted by the regulations of the governing board, the sale or gift may be made to, and the exchange may be made with, any person, political subdivision, public officer or agency, or educational institution. The distribution of the published material in accordance with this section is declared to be a public purpose and in furtherance of Article IX, Section 1, of the Constitution.

A school district may also license the use of copyrights held by the district, to the same persons or entities and for the same purposes as provided in the above paragraph.

The district shall grant a license to any public agency organized under the authority of this state, unless an exclusive license has previously been granted a private publisher.

Any charge which may be assessed a public agency for the license to use the copyright or for materials, to which the district holds the copyright, shall not exceed the cost to the district of the preparation and reproduction of the materials.

Any granting of a license, by a school district, to reproduce copyrighted material is declared to be for a public purpose in furtherance of Article XI, Section 1, of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17554.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of any school district owning land upon which agricultural products are grown may enter into agreements with an agricultural cooperative or association for the purpose of maintaining, harvesting or selling the products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17555.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the governing board of any school district may sell or lease any personal property belonging to the district to any private educational institution for use in any summer school which the institution offers in a facility of the district used under a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 17527.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Dedication of Real Property [17556. - 17561.]

17556.

The governing board of any school district may, pursuant to this article, dedicate or convey to the state, or any political subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, for public street or highway purposes, either with or without consideration and without a vote of the electors of the district first being taken, any real property belonging to the district, either in fee or any lesser estate or interest therein, including abutter’s right of access to any public street or highway; and may dedicate or convey to any public corporation, or private corporation engaged in the public utility business, without a vote of the electors of the district first being taken, an easement to lay, construct, reconstruct, maintain, and operate water, sewer, gas, or storm drain pipes or ditches, electric or telephone lines, and access roads used in connection therewith, over and upon any land belonging to the school district, upon such terms and conditions as the parties thereto may agree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17557.

Before ordering the dedication or conveyance of any property the governing board shall in regular open meeting by a two-thirds vote of all its members adopt a resolution declaring its intention to dedicate or convey the property. The resolution shall describe the property proposed to be dedicated or conveyed in such manner as to identify it, and shall specify the purposes for which and the terms upon which it will be dedicated or conveyed, and shall fix a time not less than 10 days thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting for a public hearing upon the question of making the dedication or conveyance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17558.

Notice of adoption of the resolution and of the time and place of holding the meeting shall be given by posting copies of the resolution signed by the members of the board, or by a majority thereof, in three public places in the district not less than 10 days before the date of the meeting, and by publishing the notice once not less than five days before the date of the meeting in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the district, if there is one, or, if there is no such newspaper published in the district, then in a newspaper published in the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated and having a general circulation in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17559.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing board the public hearing shall be held, and the governing board may at the meeting, or at any other meeting of the governing board held within 60 days thereafter, unless a protest is entered, adopt a resolution by a two-thirds vote of all its members authorizing and directing the president of the governing board, or any other presiding officer, or the secretary, or the members thereof, to execute a deed of dedication or conveyance of the property and to deliver it. Upon the delivery and acceptance of the deed the dedication or conveyance is fully effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17560.

A petition protesting against the proposed dedication or conveyance signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified electors of the district, as shown by the affidavit of one of the petitioners, may be filed with the governing board at the meeting held at the time and place fixed in the resolution. If a protest is filed, the governing board shall, before taking any further action on the proposed dedication or conveyance, submit the question of whether the proposed dedication or conveyance should be made, to the superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over the district, whose decision is final. If the superintendent approves the proposed dedication or conveyance, the board may proceed as provided in Section 17559. If the superintendent of schools does not approve the proposed dedication or conveyance, no further proceedings shall be had thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17561.

Whenever school districts are required to improve and dedicate real property to the centerline of streets or highways adjacent to a schoolsite or forming an intersection at a schoolsite location, and when such street or highway rights-of-way are being conveyed to the city or county or by the city or county to the school district, the requirements of this article shall be deemed satisfied solely by posting a notice of intention to convey in an appropriate location before conveyance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Property Maintenance and Control [17565. - 17614.]



  ARTICLE 1. Duties of Governing Board [17565. - 17592.5.]

17565.

The governing board of any school district shall furnish, repair, insure against fire, and in its discretion rent the school property of its districts. The governing board may also insure the property against other perils. The insurance shall be written in any admitted insurer, or in any nonadmitted insurer to the extent and subject to the conditions prescribed in Section 1763 of the Insurance Code. Insurance on property of a district may be, in the discretion of the governing board, of the deductible type of coverage. By deductible type of coverage is meant a form
 of insurance under which the insurance becomes operative when the loss and damage exceeds an amount stipulated in the policy or policies.

The governing board, in their notice of bid for any school district construction, may indicate that it may elect to assume the cost of fire insurance by adding the coverage to the district’s existing policy and in that event bids made on the construction shall be made in the alternative, with and without the fire insurance coverage included, and the governing board shall make its election as to who shall secure and pay for the insurance at the time of accepting the bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17566.

(a) The governing board of any school district, by resolution, may establish a fund or funds for losses, and payments, including, but not limited to, health and welfare benefits for its employees as defined by Section 53200 of the Government Code, school district property, any liability, and workers’ compensation, in the county treasury for the purpose of covering the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured perils. In the fund
 or funds shall be placed those sums, to be provided in the budget of the school district, that will create an amount that, together with investments made from the fund or funds, will be sufficient in the judgment of the governing board to protect the school district from those losses or to provide for payments on the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured perils. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the governing board from providing protection against those losses or liability for the payment of claims partly by means of the fund or funds and partly by means of insurance written by acceptable insurers as provided in Section 17565.

The fund or funds shall be considered as separate and apart from all other funds of the school district, and the balance therein shall not be considered to be part of the working cash of the school
 district in compiling annual budgets. 

Warrants may be drawn on or transfers made from the fund or funds so created only to reimburse or indemnify the school district for losses as herein specified, and for the payment of claims, administrative costs, and related services, and to provide for deductible insurance amounts and purchase of excess insurance. The warrants or transfers shall be within the purpose of the fund or funds as established by resolution of the governing board. 

The cash placed in the fund or funds may be invested and reinvested by the county treasurer, with the advice and consent of the governing board of the school district, in securities that are legal investments for surplus county funds in this state. The income derived from the investments, together with interest earned on uninvested funds, shall be considered revenue of, and be deposited in, the fund. The cost of contracts or services authorized by
 this section are appropriate charges against the respective fund.

The governing board may contract for investigative, administrative, and claims adjustment services relating to claims. The contract may provide that the contracting firm may reject, settle, compromise, and approve claims against the district, or its officers or employees, within the limits and for amounts that the governing board may specify, and may provide that the contracting firm may execute and issue checks in payment of those claims, which checks shall be payable only from a trust account that may be established by the governing board. Funds in the trust account established by the board pursuant to this section shall not exceed a sum that is sufficient, as determined by the governing board to provide for the settlement of claims for a 30-day period. The rejection or settlement and approval of a claim by the contracting firm in accordance with the terms of the contract shall have the same effect
 as would the rejection or settlement and approval of the claim by the governing board.

The contract may also provide that the contracting firm may employ legal counsel, subject to terms and limitations that the board may prescribe, to advise the contracting firm concerning the legality and advisability of rejecting, settling, compromising, and paying claims referred to the contracting firm by the board for investigation and adjustment, or to represent the board in litigation concerning the claims. The compensation and expenses of the attorney for services rendered to the board shall be an appropriate charge against the appropriate fund. 

The contract provided for in this section may contain other terms and conditions that the governing board may consider necessary or desirable to effectuate the board’s self-insured programs.

In lieu of, or in addition to, contracting for the
 services described in this section, the governing board may authorize an employee or employees to perform any or all of the services and functions for which the board may contract under the provisions of this section. 

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Firm” includes a person, corporation, or other legal entity, including a county superintendent of schools.

(2) “Governing boards” includes governing boards of school districts and county superintendents of schools.

(3) “School district” includes a county superintendent of schools who may participate in or administer insurance or self-insurance programs for the county office of education or for one or more school districts. 

(c) A county
 superintendent of schools may participate in or administer insurance for one or more school districts pursuant to this section or for one or more community college districts pursuant to Section 81602, for any combination of school districts and community college districts pursuant to this section and Section 81602. 

(d) Prior to funding health and welfare benefits pursuant to this section, the school district shall secure the services of an actuary who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries to provide actuarial evaluations of the future annual costs of those benefits. The future annual costs as determined by the actuary shall be made public at a public meeting at least two weeks prior to the commencement of funding health and welfare benefits pursuant to this section.

(e) Upon commencing the funding of health and welfare benefits pursuant to this section, the school
 district shall secure the services of an actuary as described in subdivision (d) to complete, every three years, an actuarial evaluation of the annual costs of those benefits. A copy of the results of that evaluation shall be submitted by the district to the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17567.

Nothing in this code shall be construed to prohibit two or more school districts from exercising, through a joint powers agreement made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the powers prescribed in Section 17566 in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in that section and in Section 17565.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17568.

In districts situated within or partly within cities having a population of over five hundred thousand (500,000) as determined by the 1920 federal census any board of education may establish a fund in the county treasury for the purpose of covering fire losses to school property in lieu of carrying fire insurance in admitted insurers as provided in Section 17565. In the fund shall be placed sums, to be provided in the budget of the district, as will create an amount which, together with investments made from the fund, will be sufficient in the judgment of the board
 of education upon the advice of competent actuaries to protect the board of education against losses by fire on all or any part of the school property within its jurisdiction. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as prohibiting the board of education from providing protection against fire losses partly by means of the fund and partly by means of fire insurance written by admitted insurers as provided in Section 17565.

 The fund shall be considered as separate and apart from all other funds of the district and the balance therein shall not be considered as being part of the working cash of the district in compiling annual budgets or fixing annual tax rates.

Warrants shall be drawn on, or transfers made from, the fund so created only to reimburse or indemnify the school district for losses as herein specified, and for the payment of claims, administrative costs, related services, and to provide for deductible insurance
 amounts and the purchase of excess insurance. The warrants or transfers shall be within the purpose of the fund as established by resolution of the governing board.

The cash placed in the fund may be invested and reinvested by the county treasurer with the advice and consent of the board of education in securities which are legal investments for surplus county funds in this state. The income derived from such investments together with interest earned on uninvested funds shall be considered revenue of and be deposited in the fund.

The county treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the board of education as to the condition of the fund, using as a basis for the report the cost or market value, whichever may be the lower, of the securities held as investments plus the cash in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17569.

The governing board of any school district may grade, pave, construct sewers, or otherwise improve streets and other public places in front of real property owned or controlled by it, and also may construct in immediate proximity to any school or site owned or controlled by the district, pedestrian tunnels, overpasses, footbridges, sewers and water pipes when required for school or administrative purposes, may acquire property, easements and rights-of-way for such purpose, and may appropriate money to pay the cost and expense of the improvements, whether made by the
 board under contract executed by the board, or under contracts made in pursuance of any of the general laws of the state respecting street improvements, or under other contracts made in pursuance of the charter of any county or municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17570.

Any provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing board of any school district, other than a city school district with over 50,000 pupils in average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year, may construct pedestrian walks, footbridges, and pedestrian tunnels when required for the safety of pupils attending the schools of the district, may acquire easements and rights-of-way for those purposes, and may appropriate money to acquire such easements and rights-of-way and to pay the cost and expense of the improvements, whether made by the board under
 contract executed by the board, or under contracts made in pursuance of any of the general laws of the state respecting street improvements, or under other contracts made in pursuance of the charter of any county or municipality. Pedestrian walks, footbridges, and pedestrian tunnels shall be constructed, and such easements or rights-of-way for those purposes shall be acquired, within one mile of the school for the pupils of which the walks, bridges, and tunnels are necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17571.

The governing board of any school district may install and maintain a lighting system in any underpass in the vicinity of a schoolhouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17572.

The governing board of any school district may appropriate money to pay assessments, for the improvement of streets or other public places, levied against any real property owned by, or under the control of the board, when the property is included within an assessment district formed in pursuance of any general law of the state or under the charter of any municipality. The assessments may be paid out of any funds belonging to the school district, except funds derived from the sale of bonds or required by law to be used for teachers’ salaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17573.

The governing board of every school district shall provide a warm, healthful place in which children who bring their own lunches to school may eat the lunches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17574.

The governing board of a school district may construct a mobilehome site on the grounds of any district facility or facilities maintained by the district, including all necessary appurtenances and fixtures, and may pay the cost of utilities, insurance, and necessary services, for the purpose of enabling a responsible person or persons to install and occupy a mobilehome on such site. Such person or persons, who need not be classified as employees of the district, shall, in return for being permitted to install and occupy a mobilehome on the district facility site on
 terms and conditions acceptable to the governing board, agree to maintain any surveillance over the facility grounds as the school district governing board requires, and to report to district authorities illegal or suspicious activities that are observed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17575.

The governing board of any school district, when leasing a building for housing of school district employees, may lease such building for any period they deem necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17576.

The governing board of every school district shall provide, as an integral part of each school building, or as part of at least one building of a group of separate buildings, sufficient patent flush water closets for the use of the pupils. In school districts where the water supply is inadequate, chemical water closets may be substituted for patent flush water closets by the board.

This section shall apply to all buildings existing on September 19, 1947, or constructed after such date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17577.

In addition to the other powers granted the governing board of each school district may provide sewers and drains adequate to treat and/or dispose of sewage and drainage on or away from each school property. For this purpose it may construct adequate systems or acquire adequate disposal rights in systems constructed or to be constructed by others for these purposes without regard to their proximity. The cost thereof may be paid from the building fund, including any bond moneys therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17578.

The governing board of each district maintaining a high school shall provide for the annual cleaning, sterilizing, and necessary repair of football equipment of their respective schools pursuant to Sections 17579 and 17580.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

17579.

All football equipment actually worn by pupils shall be cleaned and sterilized at least once a year. Football equipment used in spring training shall be cleaned and sterilized before it is used in the succeeding fall term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17580.

Any contract with a dealer or craftsman for the repair of football equipment belonging to the district or the state college shall specifically state or describe the materials to be used by the dealer or craftsman in repairing such equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17581.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the quality of protective equipment worn by participants in high school interscholastic football is a significant factor in the occurrence of injuries to such participants and that it is therefore necessary to insure minimum standards of quality for the equipment in order to prevent unnecessary injuries to such participants.

(b) No football helmets shall be worn by participants in high school interscholastic football unless the equipment
 has been certified for use by the National Operating Committee on Standards for Athletic Equipment or any other recognized certifying agency in the field.

This section shall not be construed as relieving school districts from the duty of maintaining football protective equipment in a safe and serviceable condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17582.

(a) The governing board of a school district may establish a restricted fund to be known as the “district deferred maintenance fund” for purposes including, but not limited to, major repair or replacement of plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, electrical, roofing, and floor systems; the exterior and interior painting of school buildings; the inspection, sampling, and analysis of building materials to determine the presence of asbestos-containing materials; the encapsulation or removal of asbestos-containing materials; the inspection, identification, sampling, and analysis of building materials to determine the presence of lead-containing materials; and the control, management, and removal of lead-containing materials. Funds deposited in the district deferred maintenance fund may be
 received from any source and shall be accounted for separately from all other funds and accounts and retained in the district deferred maintenance fund for purposes of this section. The term “school building” as used in this article includes a facility that a county office of education is authorized to use pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3.

(b) Funds deposited in the district deferred maintenance fund shall only be expended for maintenance purposes as provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The governing board of each school district shall have complete control over the funds and earnings of funds once deposited in the district deferred maintenance fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 12.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17583.

(a) (1) If a governing board of a school district applies for state funding pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for a school modernization project for a school facility constructed before January 1, 2012, the governing board of the school district shall include, as part of the modernization project, locks that allow doors to classrooms, and any room with an occupancy of five or more persons, to be locked from the inside of the room, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) The requirement in paragraph (1) does not apply to doors that are locked from the outside at all times, doors with locks that lock from inside, and pupil restrooms.

(b) The
 locks required by subdivision (a) shall conform to the specifications and requirements set forth in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) (1) The requirements of this section apply only to those projects seeking funding, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), on or after January 1, 2019, and that were submitted to the Division of the State Architect for approval on or after January 1, 2019.

(2) The requirements of this section shall apply only to those projects that propose to renovate, repair, or modernize the interior of a school building and do not apply to projects that only propose to renovate, repair, or modernize the exterior of a school building, the school grounds, or the playing fields of a school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 39.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17584.

(a) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) If a local educational agency intends to seek state funding pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10, for a school modernization project for a school
 facility constructed before January 1, 2012, the modernization project submitted to the Division of the State Architect shall include faucet aerators and water-conserving plumbing fixtures, as defined in Section 1101.3 of the Civil Code, in all bathrooms.

(c) (1) The requirements of this section apply only to those projects submitted to
 the Division of the State Architect three months after voters approve a statewide general obligation bond that provides funds for school facilities for kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, at a statewide election occurring after November 1, 2022.

(2) The requirements of this section shall apply only to those projects that
 contain an existing faucet or water plumbing fixture in the space to be modernized or repaired and propose to modernize or repair the interior of a school building and do not apply to projects that only propose to repair or make alterations to the exterior of a school building, the
 school grounds, or the playing fields of a school.

(3) Bathrooms that already contain both faucet aerators and water-conserving plumbing fixtures, as defined in Section 1101.3 of the Civil Code, at the time a modernization project is submitted to the Division of the State Architect, shall not be subject to the requirements in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 434, Sec. 1.   (AB 1867)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17585.

(a) If the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school applies for state funding pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for a school modernization project, the application shall include, as part of the modernization project, an all-gender restroom designed exclusively for pupil use, excluding restrooms designated for pupils in transitional kindergarten or kindergarten, at each schoolsite that has not already established an all-gender restroom pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35292.5 and for each schoolsite that does not have more than one female restroom and more than one male restroom designated exclusively for pupil use.

(b) The
 requirements of this section apply only to those projects submitted for approval on or after July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 227, Sec. 2.   (SB 760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17586.

(a) A school district, county office of education, or charter school serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that undertakes an addition, alteration, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or retrofit of a school building, shall install interior locks on each door of any room with an occupancy of five or more persons in that school building.

(b) The requirement in subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Doors that are locked from the outside at all times, doors with locks that lock from the inside, and pupil restrooms.

(2) The maintenance of a school facility for individual projects or tasks under
 twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(3) Projects applying for funding pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 for a school modernization project, before January 1, 2025, and that were initially submitted to the Division of the State Architect for approval before January 1, 2025.

(c) The locks required by subdivision (a) shall conform to the specifications and requirements set forth in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) For purposes of this section, “addition,” “alteration,” “reconstruction,” “rehabilitation,” “retrofit,” “school building,” and “maintenance” have the same meaning as specified in Section 4-314 of Part 1 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) The implementation of this section
 is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 45.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17589.

The State Allocation Board shall develop board policies for the apportionment of funds appropriated for the containment or removal of asbestos materials in schools pursuant to Section 49410. The policies shall provide for the allocation of funds on a matching basis, or the board may determine, based on each application, to increase the allocation to any school district by the amount it determines is necessary to complete critical projects. In making policies pursuant to this section, the board may establish funding priorities based on a determination in each instance
 as to the imminence of the health hazard posed by the asbestos materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17590.

The Asbestos Abatement Fund is hereby created, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited in this fund are continuously appropriated to be administered by the State Allocation Board for the purpose of making allocations to school districts and county offices of education pursuant to Sections 17589 and 49410.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17592.5.

The Southern California Regional Occupational Center and the Metropolitan Education District, each of which is a joint powers authority, shall be deemed to be school districts for purposes of Sections 17582, 17589, and 17590.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 14.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. School Assessments of Buildings and Emergency Repairs Grant Program [17592.70. - 17592.74.]

17592.70.

(a) There is hereby established the School Facilities Needs Assessment Grant Program with the purpose to provide for a one-time comprehensive assessment of school facilities needs. The grant program shall be administered by the State Allocation Board.

(b) (1) The grants shall be awarded to school districts on behalf of schoolsites ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the Academic Performance Index (API), pursuant to Section 52056, based on the 2003 base API score for each school newly constructed prior to January 1, 2000.

(2) For purposes of this section, schools ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the 2003 base API shall include any schools determined by the department to meet either of the following:

(A) The school meets all of the following criteria:

(i) Does not have a valid base API score for 2003.

(ii) Is operating in fiscal year 2004-05 and was operating in fiscal year 2003-04 during the Standardized Testing and Reporting (STAR) Program testing period.

(iii) Has a valid base API score for 2002 that was ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, in that year.

(B) The school has an estimated base API score for 2003 that would be in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive.

(3) The department shall estimate an API score for any school meeting the criteria of clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and not meeting the criteria of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), using available testing scores and any weighting or corrective factors it deems appropriate. The department shall provide those API scores to the Office of Public School Construction and post them on its Web site within 30 days of the enactment of this section.

(4) For purposes of this section, schools ranked in deciles 1 to 3, inclusive, on the 2003 base API shall exclude any schools determined by the department to be operated by county offices of education pursuant to Section 56140.

(c) The board shall allocate funds pursuant to subdivision (b) to school districts with jurisdiction over eligible schoolsites, based on ten dollars ($10) per pupil enrolled in the eligible school as of October 2003, with a minimum allocation of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each schoolsite.

(d) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this section, school districts shall do all of the following:
